Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General
§ 1-40-119.
Surcharge
to be assessed in certain criminal cases; paid to account.

In addition to any fine or other penalty prescribed by law, a defendant who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, or is convicted of, the following criminal offenses shall be assessed a surcharge of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300.00) for the offenses specified in paragraph (v) of this subsection, not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) nor more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) for the first plea to or conviction of offenses specified in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection, and not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) for each subsequent plea to or conviction of offenses specified in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection:

Any violation of W.S.

6-1-101

through

6-2-313

and

6-2-319

through

6-10-203

;

Any violation of W.S.

31-5-225

,

31-5-229

,

31-5-233

or 41-13-220(a);

Any violation of W.S.

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

;

Any violation of W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-318

;

Any violation of a municipal ordinance which has substantially similar elements to the criminal offenses specified in paragraphs (ii) through (iv) of this subsection or any other violation of a municipal ordinance which causes actual damage to persons or property.

The surcharge enumerated in subsection (a) of this section shall be imposed upon any defendant for whom prosecution, trial or sentence is deferred under W.S.

7-13-301

and

7-13-302

or who participates in any other diversion agreement.

Under no circumstances shall a court fail to impose the surcharge required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section if the court determines the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

The surcharge shall be paid within ten (10) days of imposition unless the court determines that it shall be paid in installments over a reasonable period of time. Failure to comply with the provisions for payment of the surcharge is punishable as contempt of court. Contempt proceedings or other proceedings to collect the surcharge may be initiated by the prosecuting attorney, by the court on its own motion or by the division.

Monies paid to the court by a defendant shall be applied to the surcharge before being applied to any fine, penalty, cost or assessment imposed upon the defendant. The proceeds from the surcharge imposed by this section shall be remitted promptly by the clerk of the court to the division for deposit in the account.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1987, ch. 154, § 1; 1991, ch. 155, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; ch. 167, § 2; 1993, ch. 17, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 1999, ch. 136, § 1; 2007, ch. 135, § 1; ch. 159, § 2; 2008, ch. 49, § 1; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of earnings paid to prisoners, see §§

7-16-205

and

7-16-308

.

As to record and disbursement of wages, see §

7-18-114

.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or 41-13-220(a)” in (a)(ii), and made related changes.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 159, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “6-2-314 through

6-2-319

” for “14-3-104 or

14-3-105

” in (a)(iv).

While neither amendment gave affect to the other, both have been set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in introductory language of (a), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00),” substituted “one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) nor more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00),” added “, and not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) for each subsequent plea to or conviction of offenses specified in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection,” and made stylistic changes; in (d), added “or by the division” at the end, and made a related change.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) substituted “violation of W.S.

6-1-101

through

6-2-313

and

6-2-319

through

6-10-203

” for “crime enumerated in W.S.

6-1-101

through

6-10-203

.”

Duty of court. —

This section imposes a mandatory duty on trial court to order payment of surcharge. Nixon v. State, 4 P.3d 864,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2000).

When assessed. —

A criminal defendant's sentence was not illegal merely because he was not present when the crime victim's surcharge was assessed against him pursuant to this section. Brown v. State, 929 P.2d 522,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1996).

No maximum amount. —

While paragraph (a)(i) of this section requires a court to impose a minimum crime victim's surcharge, this section places no limit on the maximum surcharge that the court can require. Bird v. State, 939 P.2d 735,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1997).

A surcharge of $150 upon defendant's convictions for kidnapping and rape was not illegal as being in excess of the amount prescribed by this section. Bird v. State, 939 P.2d 735,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1997).

Unlawful to extend payment beyond 10 days. —

Where the district court determined that the defendant could not pay more than $50 within the 10-day period, and required the balance of the surcharge ($1,450) to be thereafter paid according to an executive agency plan, this constituted an unlawful imposition and statutorily unauthorized surplusage. Seaton v. State, 811 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1991) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

The portion of a sentence extending the time for payment of the surcharge beyond the 10-day period specified in subsection (d) after entry of judgment is an unlawful imposition and a statutorily unauthorized surplusage. Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. Dec. 4, 1991) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

Ability to pay. —

A trial court must make a finding with regard to the criminal defendant's ability to pay before ordering him to pay a victim's compensation surcharge. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Surcharge not forgiven for failure to pay. —

The plain language of this section directs that a surcharge will not be forgiven or vacated simply because a defendant did not pay it within the 10-day period. Johnson v. State, 914 P.2d 810,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1996).

Restitution. —

A trial court's order that convicted arsonists pay an additional $1,500 victims' compensation surcharge was simply an alternative way of ordering the arsonists to pay restitution for the victims' loss of enjoyment of life. Such awards are improper. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Frenzel v. State, 849 P.2d 741,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Hyde v. State, 769 P.2d 376,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Dreiman v. State, 825 P.2d 758,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1992).

For article, “A Comprehensive Treatise on Contempt of Court in Wyoming,” see
15 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2015).